Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1741.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1289.23, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1289.23.


CONCEALED FIREARM FOR OFF-DUTY POLICE OFFICER


A. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a


full-time duly appointed peace officer who is certified by the


Council on Law Enforcement Education and Training (CLEET), pursuant


to the provisions of Section 3311 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma


Statutes, is hereby authorized to carry a weapon approved by the


employing agency anywhere in the state of Oklahoma throughout this


state, both while on active duty and during periods when the officer



Req. No. 3487 Page 1


is not on active duty as provided by the provisions of for in


subsection B of this section.


B. When a full-time duly appointed officer carries an approved


weapon, the officer shall be wearing the law enforcement uniform


prescribed by the employing agency or plainclothes. When not


wearing the prescribed law enforcement uniform, the officer shall be


required:


1. To have the official peace officers officer’s badge,


Commission Card commission card, and CLEET Certification Card on his


or her person at all times when carrying a weapon approved by the


employing agency; and


2. To keep the approved weapon on his or her person at all


times, except when the weapon is used within the guidelines


established by the employing agency.


C. Nothing in this section shall be construed to alter or amend


the provisions of Section 1272.1 of this title or expand the duties,


authority, or jurisdiction of any peace officer.


D. A reserve peace officer who has satisfactorily completed a


basic police course of not less than one hundred twenty (120) hours


of accredited instruction for reserve police officers and reserve


deputies from the Council on Law Enforcement Education and Training


or a course of study approved by CLEET may carry an approved weapon


when such officer is off duty as provided by subsection E of this


section, provided:

Req. No. 3487 Page 2


1. The officer has been granted written authorization signed by


the director of the employing agency; and


2. The employing agency shall maintain a current list of any


officers authorized to carry an approved weapon while the officers


are off duty, and shall provide a copy of such list to the Council


on Law Enforcement Education and Training. Any change to the list


shall be made in writing and mailed to the Council on Law


Enforcement Education and Training within five (5) days.


E. When an off-duty reserve peace officer carries an approved


weapon, the officer shall be wearing the law enforcement uniform


prescribed by the employing agency or when not wearing the


prescribed law enforcement uniform, the officer shall be required:


1. To have his or her official peace officer’s badge,


Commission Card commission card, and CLEET Certification Card; and


2. To keep the approved weapon on his or her person at all


times, except when the weapon is used within the guidelines


established by the employing agency.


F. Nothing in subsection D of this section shall be construed


to alter or amend the provisions of Section 1750.2 of Title 59 of


the Oklahoma Statutes or expand the duties, jurisdiction, or


authority of any reserve peace officer.


G. Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit or


restrict any peace officer or reserve peace officer from carrying a


handgun, concealed or unconcealed, as allowed by the Oklahoma Self-

Req. No. 3487 Page 3


Defense Act after issuance of a valid license. An off-duty, full-


time peace officer or reserve peace officer shall be deemed to have


elected to carry a handgun under the authority of the Oklahoma Self-


Defense Act when the officer:


1. Has been issued a valid handgun license and is carrying a


handgun not authorized by the employing agency; or


2. Is carrying a handgun in a manner or in a place not


specifically authorized for off-duty carry by the employing agency.


H. Any off-duty peace officer who carries any weapon in


violation of the provisions of this section shall be deemed to be in


violation of Section 1272 of this title and may be prosecuted as


provided by law for a violation of that section.


I. On or after November 1, 2004, a A reserve or full-time


commissioned peace officer may apply to carry a weapon pursuant to


the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act as follows:


1. The officer shall apply online through the Oklahoma State


Bureau of Investigation’s website or in writing to the Council on


Law Enforcement Education and Training (CLEET) stating that the


officer desires to have a handgun license pursuant to the Oklahoma


Self-Defense Act and certifying that he or she has no preclusions to


having such handgun license. The officer shall submit with the


application:


a. an official letter from his or her employing agency


confirming the officer’s employment and status as a

Req. No. 3487 Page 4


full-time commissioned peace officer or an active


reserve peace officer,


b. a fee of Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) for the handgun


license, and


c. two passport-size photographs of the peace officer


applicant;


2. Upon receiving the required information, CLEET shall


determine whether the peace officer is in good standing, has CLEET


certification and training, and is otherwise eligible for a handgun


license. Upon verification of the officer’s eligibility, CLEET


shall send the information to the Oklahoma State Bureau of


Investigation (OSBI) and OSBI shall issue a handgun license in the


same or similar form as other handgun licenses. All other


requirements in Section 1290.12 of this title concerning application


for a handgun license shall be waived for active duty peace officers


except as provided in this subsection including, but not limited to,


training, fingerprints, and criminal history records checks unless


the officer does not have fingerprints on file or a criminal history


records background check conducted prior to employment as a peace


officer. The OSBI shall conduct a check of the National Instant


Criminal Background Check System (NICS) prior to the issuance of a


handgun license. The OSBI shall not be required to conduct any


further investigation into the eligibility of the peace officer



Req. No. 3487 Page 5


applicant and shall not deny a handgun license except when


preclusions are found to exist;


3. The term of the handgun license for an active duty reserve


or full-time commissioned peace officer pursuant to this section


shall be as provided in Section 1290.5 of this title, renewable in


the same manner provided in this subsection for an original


application by a peace officer. The handgun license shall be valid


when the peace officer is in possession of a valid driver license


and law enforcement commission card;


4. If the commission card of a law enforcement officer is


terminated, revoked, or suspended, the handgun license shall be


immediately returned to CLEET. When a peace officer in possession


of a handgun license pursuant to this subsection changes employment,


the person must notify CLEET within ninety (90) days and send a new


letter verifying employment and status as a full-time commissioned


or reserve peace officer;


5. There shall be no refund of any fee for any unexpired term


of any handgun license that is suspended, revoked, or voluntarily


returned to CLEET, or that is denied, suspended, or revoked by the


OSBI;


6. CLEET may promulgate any rules, forms, or procedures


necessary to implement the provisions of this section; and


7. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to change or


amend the application process, eligibility, effective date, or fees

Req. No. 3487 Page 6


of any handgun license pending issuance on November 1, 2004, or


previously issued to any peace officer prior to November 1, 2004.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3487 CN 1/14/2026 2:34:28 PM







































Req. No. 3487 Page 7